apertium-haa.haa.lexd
[l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:n>             jënochèe:chèe[l,impf,0cm]           # "turn over"               (ANOturnOver1)              Lemma/1sg-impf - missing jë prefix, what is it?
[l,perf,dh]:                [l,perf,dh]:                [l,perf,dh]:                [l,perf,dh]:n>              jënochèe:chįį[l,perf,dh]            # "turn over"               (ANOturnOver1)              Lemma/1sg-impf    
[l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:n>              jënochèe:chew[l,fut,0cm]            # "turn over"               (ANOturnOver1)              Lemma/1sg-impf
[ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:j{E}{¨}>       [ł,impf,0cm]:               jënohtlòt:nohtlòt[ł,impf,0cm]       # "boil liquid caus."       (Boil1LiquidCaus)           Lemma/3sg-impf
[ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:n>             nöksreww:{Z}reww[ł,impf,0cm]        # "comb"                    (CombBrush1)                Lemma/1sg-impf
[ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]:n>              nöksreww:{Z}reww[ł,fut,0cm]         # "comb"                    (CombBrush1)                Lemma/1sg-impf
[ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:n>             nöksreww:{Z}rew[ł,impf,0cm]         # "comb"                    (CombBrush1)                Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]:n>              nöksreww:{Z}rew[ł,fut,0cm]          # "comb"                    (CombBrush1)                Lemma/1sg-impf
# [ł,perf,??]:              [ł,perf,??]:                [ł,perf,??]:                [ł,perf,??]:n>              nöksreww:{Z}rew'[ł,perf,??]         #"comb"                     (CombBrush1)                Lemma/1sg-impf - not enough data to determine perfective conj marking
[0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             ihtröö:tröö[0cl,impf,0cm]           # "cry, weep"               (CryWeep1)                  Lemma/1sg-impf
[0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             ihtröö:tröh[0cl,impf,0cm]           # "cry, weep"               (CryWeep1)                  Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              ihtröö:tröö[0cl,fut,0cm]            # "cry, weep"               (CryWeep1)                  Lemma/1sg-impf
[0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              ihtröö:tröh[0cl,fut,0cm]            # "cry, weep"               (CryWeep1)                  Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[0cl,perf,n]:               [0cl,perf,n]:               [0cl,perf,n]:               [0cl,perf,n]:               ihtröö:trö̀ʼ[0cl,perf,n]             # "cry, weep"               (CryWeep1)                  Lemma/1sg-impf
[l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               chʼeydzöö:odzöö[l,impf,0cm]         # "dance"                   (Dance)                     Lemma/1sg-impf - missing ch' prefix
[l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                chʼeydzöö:odzöö[l,fut,0cm]          # "dance"                   (Dance)                     Lemma/1sg-impf
[l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               chʼeydzöö:odzöh[l,impf,0cm]         # "dance"                   (Dance)                     Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                chʼeydzöö:odzöh[l,fut,0cm]          # "dance"                   (Dance)                     Lemma/1sg-impf
[L,PErf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]:                chʼeydzöö:odzö̀ʼ[l,perf,gh]          # "dance"                   (Dance)                     Lemma/1sg-impf
[ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]<dir>:u>        [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:d>             udohkät:kät[ł,impf,0cm]             # "ask"                     (DID NOT FIND FILE NAME)    Lemma/3sg-impf - d is sometimes j, add phonology rule?
[ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]<dir>:u>         [ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]:d>              udohkät:kät[ł,fut,0cm]              # "ask"                     (DID NOT FIND FILE NAME)    Lemma/3sg-impf - TODO: NEED TO FIND FILE AND GET 1SG-IMPF FORM
[l,perf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]<dir>:u>         [l,perf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]:d>              udohkät:ket[l,perf,gh]              # "ask"                     (DID NOT FIND FILE NAME)    Lemma/3sg-impf
[d,impf,0cm]:               [d,impf,0cm]:               [d,impf,0cm]:               [d,impf,0cm]:               ishnąą:nąą[d,impf,0cm]              # "drink"                   (Drink)                     Lemma/1sg-impf 
[0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             ihnąą:nąą[0cl,impf,0cm]             # "drink"                   (Drink)                     Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR  alternating classifers for verb
[d,perf,gh]:                [d,perf,gh]:                [d,perf,gh]:                [d,perf,gh]:                jënąą:nąʼ[d,perf,gh]                # "drink"                   (Drink)                     Lemma/3sg-impf - this can also be conjugated in the 0cl gh-perf
# [d,incp,dh]:              [d,incp,dh]:                [d,incp,dh]:                [d,incp,dh]:                jënąą:nąʼ[d,incp,dh]                # "drink"                   (Drink)                     Lemma/3sg-impf
[d,fut,0cm]:                [d,fut,0cm]:                [d,fut,0cm]:                [d,fut,0cm]:                jënąą:naw[d,fut,0cm]                # "drink"                   (Drink)                     Lemma/3sg-impf - there is also sometimes a second w, as well as unclear nasality
[l,impf,0cm]:nä>            [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               nä’aww:’àww[l,impf,0cm]             # "eat"                     (Eat)                       Lemma/3sg-impf
[l,perf,dh]:nä>             [l,perf,dh]:                [l,perf,dh]:                [l,perf,dh]:                 nädhozrèe:ozrèe[l,perf,dh]         # "hunt around"             (HuntAround2)                              - RB, confirm this lemma and prefix
[l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               neyzrèe:zrèe[l,impf,0cm]            # "hunt around"             (HuntAround2)               Lemma/1sg-impf - missing perambulative "nä"
[l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                neyzrèe:zrèe[l,fut,0cm]             # "hunt around"             (HuntAround2)               Lemma/1sg-impf
[l,perf,dh]:                [l,perf,dh]:                [l,perf,dh]:                [l,perf,dh]:                neyzrèe:zrèʼ[l,perf,dh]             # "hunt around"             (HuntAround2)               Lemma/1sg-impf
[0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              ihdlòo:dlòo[0cl,fut,0cm]            # "laugh"                   (Laugh)                     Lemma/1sg-impf
[0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             ihdlòo:dlòo[0cl,impf,0cm]           # "laugh"                   (Laugh)                     Lemma/1sg-impf
[0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             [0cl,impf,0cm]:             ihdlòo:dlòh[0cl,impf,0cm]           # "laugh"                   (Laugh)                     Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              [0cl,fut,0cm]:              ihdlòo:dlòh[0cl,fut,0cm]            # "laugh"                   (Laugh)                     Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[0cl,perf,n]:               [0cl,perf,n]:               [0cl,perf,n]:               [0cl,perf,n]:               ihdlòo:dlòʼ[0cl,perf,n]             # "laugh"                   (Laugh)                     Lemma/1sg-impf
[ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               öktseyy:tseyy[ł,impf,0cm]           # "make"                    (Make)                      Lemma/1sg-impf 
[ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]:                [ł,fut,0cm]:                öktseyy:tseyy[ł,fut,0cm]            # "make"                    (Make)                      Lemma/1sg-impf  
[ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               öktseyy:tsey[ł,impf,0cm]            # "make"                    (Make)                      Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[ł,perf,dh]:                [ł,perf,dh]:                [ł,perf,dh]:                [ł,perf,dh]:                öktseyy:tsąyy[ł,perf,dh]            # "make"                    (Make)                      Lemma/1sg-impf
[ł,perf,dh]:                [ł,perf,dh]:                [ł,perf,dh]:                [ł,perf,dh]:                öktseyy:tsąy[ł,perf,dh]             # "make"                    (Make)                      Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:               [l,impf,0cm]:n>             neyjät:jät[l,impf,0cm]              # "scare"                   (ScareScared1)              Lemma/1sg-impf
[l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:                [l,fut,0cm]:n>              neyjät:jät[l,fut,0cm]               # "scare"                   (ScareScared1)              Lemma/1sg-impf
[l,perf,0cm]:               [l,perf,0cm]:               [l,perf,0cm]:               [l,perf,0cm]:n>             neyjät:jät[l,perf,n]                # "scare"                   (ScareScared1)              Lemma/1sg-impf
[l,impf,fut,0cm]:           [l,impf,fut,0cm]:           [l,impf,fut,0cm]:           [l,impf,fut,0cm]:n>         neyjät:jöt[l,impf,fut,0cm]          # "scare"                   (ScareScared1)              Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR  
[l,perf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]:n>              neyjät:jït[l,perf,gh]               # "scare"                   (ScareScared1)              Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[l,perf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]:                [l,perf,gh]:n>              neyjät:jö̀t[l,perf,gh]               # "scare"                   (ScareScared1)              Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:n>             nök-ʼįį:ʼįį[ł,impf,0cm]             # "see"                     (SeeA)                      Lemma/1sg-impf 
[ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:               [ł,impf,0cm]:n>             nök-ʼįį:ʼįh[ł,impf,0cm]             # "see"                     (SeeA)                      Lemma/1sg-impf  Dir/LR
[ł,perf,n]:                 [ł,perf,n]:                 [ł,perf,n]:                 [ł,perf,n]:n>               nök-ʼįį:ʼį̀ʼ[ł,perf,n]               # "see"                     (SeeA)                      Lemma/1sg-impf
